dictsource/fa_rules
// *   Farsi Language fa (or Parsi or Persian) fa_rules Version 3.11
// *   This file writen by Shadyar Khodayari 02-05-2014
//*********
// *   This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify  *
// *   it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by  *
// *   the Free Software Foundation; either version 3 of the License, or     *
// *   (at your option) any later version.                                   *
// *                                                                         *
// *   This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,       *
// *   but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of        *
// *   MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the         *
// *   GNU General Public License for more details.                          *
// *                                                                         *
// *   You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License     *
// *   along with this program; if not, see:                                 *
// *               <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.                           *
// ***************************************************************************/

// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// all words must be LOWER CASE  (although the initial letter will be automatically
//    converted if it's a 7bit ascii character)
// Text to phoneme rules for Farsi


// replacing unknown characters and Arabic   numbers with Farsi characters and Latin  numbers
.replace
		٠	0
		۰	0
		۱	1
		١	1
		٢	2
		۲	2
		٣	3
		۳	3
		٤	4
		۴	4
		٥	5
		۵	5
		٦	6
		۶	6
		٧	7
		۷	7
		٨	8
		۸	8
		٩	9
		۹	9
		
		٪	%
		ٔ	ٴ
		ي	ی	// this is "ي" Shift + x on the Persian Keyboard ("ye Arabi") that has been replaced with "ی" Standard for some programing reasones.
		ﺁ	آ
		ﺍ	ا
		ﺎ	ا
		ﺄ	أ
		ﺏ	ب
		ﺐ	ب
		ﺑ ب
		ﺒ	ب
		ﭖ	پ
		ﭗ	پ
		ﭘ	پ
		ﭙ	پ
		ﺕ	ت
		ﺖ	ت
		ﺗ	ت
		ﺘ	ت
		ﺚ	ث
		ﺛ	ث
		ﺜ	ث
		ﺝ	ج
		ﺞ	ج
		ﺠ	ج
		ﺟ	ج
		ﭻ	چ
		ﭼ چ
		ﭽ	چ
		ﺢ	ح
		ﺣ	ح
		ﺤ	ح
		ﺥ	خ
		ﺦ	خ
		ﺧ	خ
		ﺨ	خ
		ﺩ	د
		ﺪ	د
		ﺫ	ذ
		ﺬ	ذ
		ﺭ	ر
		ﺮ ر
		ﺯ	ز
		ﺰ	ز
		ﮊ	ژ
		ﮋ	ژ
		ﺱ	س
		ﺲ	س
		ﺳ	س
		ﺴ	س
		ﺵ	ش
		ﺶ	ش
		ﺷ	ش
		ﺸ	ش
		ﺹ	ص
		ﺺ	ص
		ﺻ	ص
		ﺼ	ص
		ﺽ	ض
		ﺿ	ض
		ﻀ	ض
		ﻁ	ط
		ﻂ	ط
		ﻃ	ط
		ﻄ	ط
		ﻇ	ظ
		ﻈ	ظ
		ﻉ	ع
		ﻊ	ع
		ﻋ	ع
		ﻌ ع
		ﻍ	غ
		ﻎ	غ
		ﻏ	غ
		ﻐ	غ
		ﻑ	ف
		ﻒ	ف
		ﻓ	ف
		ﻔ	ف			
		ﻕ	ق
		ﻖ	ق
		ﻗ	ق
		ﻘ	ق
		ك	ک
		ﮎ	ک
		ﮏ	ک
		ﮐ	ک
		ﮑ	ک
		ﻛ	ک
		ﻚ	ک
		ﻜ	ک
		ﮒ	گ
		ﮓ	گ
		ﮔ	گ
		ﮕ	گ
		ﻝ	ل
		ﻞ	ل
		ﻟ	ل
		ﻠ	ل
		ﻡ م
		ﻢ م
		ﻣ	م
		ﻤ	م
		ﻥ	ن
		ﻦ	ن
		ﻧ	ن
		ﻨ ن
		ﻭ	و
		ﻮ	و
		ھ	ه
		ە	ه
		ﻩ	ه
		ﻪ	ه
		ﻫ	ه
		ﻬ	ه
		ى	ی
		ۍ	ی
		ﯼ	ی
		ﯽ ی
		ﯾ ی
		ﯿ	ی
		ﻰ	ی
		ﻱ	ی
		ﻲ	ی
		ﻳ	ی
		ﻴ	ی
		ﻯ	ی
		ﻻ	لا
		ﻼ	لا
		ﺔ	ة
		ﺋ	ئ
		ﺌ	ئ
		ﺆ	ؤ
		ﺀ	ء
		ﹺ	ِ
		// Urdu for Persian users added
			ٹ	ت
			ڈ	د
			ڑ	ر
			ہ	ه
			ﮩ	ه
			ﮨ	ه
			ے	ی
			ں	ن
			ۃ	ت
			ۂ	ه
			ۓ	ی


			// (ZWNJ) U+200c character (half space) is recognized as Hyphen and this simbole "-" have been definded for this character in the rules.

// the groups of letters
// Long vowels
.L01  آ ا ی ي و

// short vowels (commonly unwritten )
.L02  َ ُ ِ ْ ً ٌ ٍ ّ ؤ أ إ ء ۀ

// All consonants
.L03  ب پ ت ث ج چ ح خ د ذ ر ز ژ س ش ص ض ط ظ ع غ ف ق ک گ ل م ن ه ة ئ

// all Farsi characters without ا آ and Short vowels
.L04  ض ص ث ق ف غ ع ه خ ح ج چ ش س ی ب ل ت ن م ک گ ۀ ظ ط ز ر ذ د ئ و ة ي ژ ؤ إ أ ء ؟ پ 

// Group one of consonants
.L05  ث س ص ش ذ ز ض ظ ف ل ن

// Group two of consonants
.L06  ب پ ت ج چ ح خ د ر ژ ط ع غ ق ک گ م ه

// some of suffixes which starting with short vowels (for preventing of short vowels conflict in consonants analyzer)
.L07  ن م ت ش ک مان تان شان ند نده ندۀ ندگی ندگان گی گان گانه گانۀ ستان ست

// All vowels (long + Short)
.L08  آ ا ی ي و َ ُ ِ ْ ً ٌ ٍ ّ ؤ أ إ ء ۀ

// all Farsi characters without short vowels
.L09  ض ص ث ق ف غ ع ه خ ح ج چ ش س ی ب ل ا ت ن م ک گ ۀ آ ظ ط ز ر ذ د ئ و ة ي ژ پ ؤ إ أ ء ؟ ّ


// (ZWNJ) U+200c character (half space) is recognized as Hyphen and this simbole "-" has been definded for this character in the rules.


.group +
		+ (.D	mosbate-
		__) + (_D	mosbate-


.group -
		- (.D	manfije-
		__) - (_D	manfije-


.group آ
	_) آN	'A:
	آ	'A

	// Prefixes آ
		
	// Suffixes آ
		L09L04) آور (_Sm3	AvaR
		L09L04) آورد (_Sm4	AvaRd
		L09L04) آموز (_Sm4	Amuz
		L09L04) آمیز (_Sm4	Amiz
		L09L04) آلود (_Sm4	Alud
		L09L04) آباد (_Sm4	AbAd
		L09L04) آفرین (_Sm5	AfaRin
		L09L09) آموخته (_Sm6	Amuxte:
		L09L09) آموختۀ (_Sm6	Amuxteje
		L09L09) آگاه (_Sm4	AgAh
		L09L09)آلات  (_Sm4	AlAt
		L09L09)آباد  (_Sm4	A'bAd


.group ا
	// special codes for "الله"
		-) ا (لله_	o
		-) ا (للّه_+	o
	_) ا (L02_	alef?
	_) ا (L02L09	
	_) ا (L01L03	
	_) ا	'a:
	_) ا (ع	e
	ا	'A
	ا (_	'A
	اً	an
	اٍ	en
	اٌ	on
	ا (ٓ	A

	// Prefixes ا
		_) ال (L09L09L09P2@	al
		_) امیر (L04L09L09P4@	amiR
		_) امیر (آL09L09P4@	amiR
		_) اکبر (L04L09L09P4@	akbaR
		_) اکبر (آL09L09P4@	akbaR
		_) اصغر (L04L09L09P4@	asq1aR
		_) اصغر (آL09L09P4@	asq1aR
		_) ابو (L04L09L09$noprefixP3@	abu	// $noprefix means if another prefix has been removed before this prefix, this rule is not matched.
		_) ابو (آL09L09$noprefixP3@	abu
		_) ابوال (L04L09L09$noprefixP5@	abol'
		_) ابوال (آL09L09$noprefixP5@	abol'

	// Suffixes ا
		L09L04) الله (_Sm4	ollAh
		L09L04) اللّه (_Sm5	ollAh
		-L09L04) الله (_Sm4	ollAh
		-L09L04) اللّه (_Sm5	ollAh
		L09L04) اً (_NSm2	an
		L09L04) اٌ (_NSm2	an
		L09L04) اٍ (_NSm2	an
		L09L09L04) ان (_Sm2	An
		//l09l09l04) انی (_NSm3	Ani
		// Plural possessive pronouns for ان eg. "مردانت"
			l09l09l04) انم (_NSm3	Anam
			l09l09l04) انت (_NSm3	Anat
			l09l09l04) انش (_NSm3	AnaS
			l09l09l04) انمان (_NSm5	AnemAn
			l09l09l04) انمون (_NSm5	Anemun
			l09l09l04) انتان (_NSm5	AnetAn
			l09l09l04) انتون (_NSm5	Anetun
			l09l09l04) انشان (_NSm5	AneSAn
			l09l09l04) انشون (_NSm5	AneSun
		L09L03L01) ات (_Sm2	At
		//L09L03L01) اتی (_NSm3	Ati
		L09L09L03) ات (_NSm2	At
		L09L09L03) اتی (_NSm3	Ati
		// Plural possessive pronouns for ات eg. " تفکراتمان"
			L09L09L03) اتم (_NSm3	Atam
			L09L09L03) اتت (_NSm3	Atat
			L09L09L03) اتش (_NSm3	AtaS
			L09L09L03) اتمان (_NSm5	AtemAn
			L09L09L03) اتمون (_NSm5	Atemun
			L09L09L03) اتتان (_NSm5	AtetAn
			L09L09L03) اتتون (_NSm5	Atetun
			L09L09L03) اتشان (_NSm5	AteSAn
			L09L09L03) اتشون (_NSm5	AteSun
			L09L09L03) اتها (_NSm4	AthA
			L09L09L03) اتهای (_NSm5	AthAje
			L09L09L03) اتهایی (_NSm6	AthAi:
		l09l09l03) انه (_NSm3	A,ne:
		l09l09l03) انۀ (_NSm3	A,neje
		L09L09L04) اور (_Sm3	AvaR
		L09L04) اورد (_Sm4	AvaRd
		L09L04) افزار (_Sm5	afzAR
		L09L04) امیز (_Sm4	Amiz
		L09L04) الود (_Sm3	Alud
		L09L04) انداز (_Sm5	andAz
		L09L04) انگیز (_Sm5	angiz
		L09L04) اباد (_Sm4	AbAd
		// Special passive pronouns eg. خوابانده
			l09l09l03) انده (_Sm4	Ande:
			l09l09l03) اندۀ (_Sm4	Andeje
		// Special Subjective pronouns eg. گزراندید
			l09l09l03) اندم (_NSm4	Andam
			l09l09l03) اندی (_NSm4	Andi
			l09l09l03) اند (_NSm3	And
			l09l09l03) اندیم (_NSm5	Andim
			l09l09l03) اندید (_NSm5	Andid
			l09l09l03) اندند (_NSm5	Andand
			l09l09l03) اندن (_NSm4	Andan
		// Special Subjective pronouns eg. گزراندید
			l09l09l03) انیدم (_NSm5	Anidam
			l09l09l03) انیدی (_NSm5	Anidi
			l09l09l03) انید (_NSm4	Anid
			l09l09l03) انیدیم (_NSm6	Anidim
			l09l09l03) انیدید (_NSm6	Anidid
			l09l09l03) انیدند (_NSm6	Anidand
			l09l09l03) انیدن (_NSm5	Anidan
		L09L04) الدین (_Sm5	oddin
		L09L04) الدّین (_Sm6	oddin
		L09L04) الدوله (_Sm6	oddole:
		L09L04) الدّوله (_Sm7	oddole:
L09L04) الدولۀ (_Sm6	oddoleje
		L09L04) الدّولۀ (_Sm7	oddoleje
		L09L04) الملک (_Sm5	olmolk
		L09L04) الملوک (_Sm6	olmoluk
		L09L04) الحکما (_Sm6	olhokamA
		L09L04) الممالک (_Sm7	olmamAlek
L09L04) السلطنه (_Sm7	ossaltane:
L09L04) السّلطنه (_Sm8	ossaltane:
L09L04) السلطنۀ (_Sm7	ossaltaneje
L09L04) السّلطنۀ (_Sm8	ossaltaneje
L09L04) السادات (_Sm7	ossAdAt
L09L04) السّادات (_Sm8	ossAdAt

	// arabic form of words  (Babs) ا
		//استفعال eg. استخراج (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
			_) ا (ستL04L04اL03_	e
		//انفعال eg. انفجار
			_) ا (نL04L04اL03_	e
		//افتعال eg. افتخار
			_) ا (L03تL04اL03_	e
		//افعال eg. اخلاق (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//افعل eg. اصغر (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)

.group ب
	// special codes for ب
		_آ) ب (L03	b
	// General Codes for Consonants
	ب (L01	b
	ب (L02	b
	L02) ب	b
	_ا) ب	b
	ب (ّL08	bb
	ب (ّ_	bb
	ب (ّL03	bba
	ب (L03	ba
	L09) ب (ب+++	ba
	// ب as first letter in bondary of the words
		_) ب (L03	ba
	// ب in end of the words
		ب (_	b
	// ب before و and a vowel
		_) ب (وا	ba
		_) ب (وL02	ba
		_) ب (ویL03	ba
		_) ب (ویL01	b
		_) ب (ویL02	b
		_) ب (وی_	b
		L09) ب (وL02	b
	// Others 
		ب (ه_+++	b
		ب (ۀ_	b
		ب (ـL01	b
		ب (ـL02	b
		ب (ـL03	ba
		ب (ــL01	b
		ب (ــL02	b
		ب (ــL03	ba
		ب (ـــL01	b
		ب (ـــL02	b
		ب (ـــL03	ba
		ب (ــ	ba
	// Consonants Analyzer
	// Right to left characters Analyzer
		// Analyzing 2nd Consonant of 3 Consonants
			_آ) ب (L03_	ba
			_آ) ب (د_+	b
			_آ) ب (ر_+	b
			_او) ب (L03_+	b
			_ای) ب (L03_+	b
			_L04) ب (L03_	b
		//Analyzing  2nd Consonant of 4 Consonants
			_L03) ب (L05L06_	ba
			_L03) ب (L06L03_	b
			_آ) ب (L03L01	b
			_آ) ب (L03L02	b
			_L03) ب (L03L01	b
			_L03) ب (L06L03	ba
			_L03) ب (رL03+	ba
			_L03) ب (L05L03	ba
		// Analyzing 3th  Consonant of 6 Consonants
			_L09L01) ب (L03L09L09	b
			_L03L03) ب (L03L09L09	b
			_L01L03) ب (L03L09L09	ba
		// Analyzing 4th  Consonant of 8 Consonants
			_L09L09L09) ب (L03L09L09L09	ba
	// Left to right characters Analyzer
		// Analyzing 2nd Consonant of 4 Consonants (left to right)
			L09L01) ب (L03_	ba
			L09L01) ب (L07_+N	b
			L01L03) ب (L03_	ba
			L01L03) ب (L07_+N	b
			L03L03) ب (L03_	ba
		// Analyzing 3th Consonant of 5 Consonants (left to right)
			L09ب) ب (L03L09_+	b
			_L04L03) ب (L06L09_+	b
			_آL03) ب (L05L06_+	ba
			_آL03) ب (L03L09_+	b
			L09L03) ب (L03L09_	ba
			L09L01) ب (L03L09_	b
		// Analyzing 4th Consonant of 7 Consonants (left to right)
			L09L09L09) ب (L03L09L09_	b
			_L01L09L03) ب (L03L09L09_	b
			_L03L09L03) ب (L03L09L09_	ba
		// Analyzing 5th Consonant of 9 Consonants (left to right)
			L09L09L09L09) ب (L03L09L09L09_	ba

	// Prefixes ب
		_) ب (L03L09L09$noprefixP1@	be
		_) ب (وL01L09$noprefixP1@	be
		_) ب (وL02L09$noprefixP1@	be
		_) بر (L04L09L09$noprefixP2@	baR
		_) بر (آL09L09$noprefixP2@	baR
		_) برمی (L04L09L09$noprefixP4@	baRmi
		_) برمی (آL09L09$noprefixP4@	baRmi
		_) برنمی (L04L09L09$noprefixP5@	baRnemi
		_) برنمی (آL09L09$noprefixP5@	baRnemi
		_) به (L04L09L09$noprefixP2@	beh
		_) به (آL09L09$noprefixP2@	beh
		_) بد (آL09L09$noprefixP2@	bad\
		_) باز (L04L09L09P3@	bAz
		_) باز (آL09L09P3@	bAz
		_) بازمی (L04L09L09$noprefixP5@	bAzmi
		_) بازمی (آL09L09$noprefixP5@	bAzmi
		_) بازنمی (L04L09L09$noprefixP6@	bAznemi
		_) بازنمی (آL09L09$noprefixP6@	bAznemi
		_) بلند (L04L09L09P4@	boland
		_) بلند (آL09L09P4@	boland
		_) بلا (L04L09L09$noprefixP3@	belA
		_) بلا (آL09L09$noprefixP3@	belA
		_) بزرگ (L04L09L09P4@	bozoRg
		_) بزرگ (آL09L09P4@	bozoRg
		_) بنفش (آL09L09P4@	banafS
		_) بنفش (L04L09L09P4@	banafS

	// suffixes ب
		L09L09) بخش (_Sm3	baxS
		//L09L09) بند (_Sm3	band
		// Plural pronoun for بند
			_L09L09) بند (_Sm3	band
			L09L01) بند (_Sm3	band
			L09L09ب) بند (_Sm3	band
			L09L09) بندی (_Sm4	bandi
			L09L09) بندها (_Sm5	bandhA
			L09L09) بندهای (_Sm6	bandhAje
			L09L09) بندهایی (_Sm7	bandhAi:
			L09L09) بندان (_Sm5	bandAn
			// Possessive pronouns for بندها
				L09L09) بندهایم (_NSm7	bandhAjam
				L09L09) بندهام (_NSm6	bandhAm
				L09L09) بندهایت (_NSm7	bandhAjat
				L09L09) بندهات (_NSm6	bandhAt
				L09L09) بندهایش (_NSm7	bandhAjaS
				L09L09) بندهاش (_NSm6	bandhAS
				L09L09) بندهایمان (_NSm9	bandhAjemAn
				L09L09) بندهامون (_NSm8	bandhAmun
				L09L09) بندهایتان (_NSm9	bandhAjetAn
				L09L09) بندهاتون (_NSm8	bandhAtun
				L09L09) بندهایشان (_NSm9	bandhAjeSAn
				L09L09) بندهاشون (_NSm8	bandhASun
		L09L09) بار (_Sm3	bAR
		L09L09) باز (_Sm3	bAz
		L09L09) بست (_Sm3	bast
		L09L09) بان (_Sm3	bAn
		L09L09) بردار (_Sm5	bardAR
		L09L09) بین (_Sm3	bin
		L09L09) بینی (_Sm4	bini
		L09L09) بیگ (_Sm3	bejg
		L09L09) بخت (_Sm3	baxt
		L09L09) باش (_Sm3	bAS
		L09L09) بزرگ (_Sm4	bozoRg
		L09L09) باور (_Sm4	bAvaR
		L09L09) برانگیز (_Sm7	baRangiz
		L09L09) باف (_Sm3	bAf
		L09L09) بافت (_Sm4	bAft
		L09L09) بلند (_Sm4	boland
